Hawaii statutes.
§263-2 Sovereignty in space.
Sovereignty in the space above the lands and waters of the State is declared to
rest in the State, except where granted to and assumed by the United States. [L
1923, c 109, §2; RL 1925, §3892; RL 1935, §6976; RL 1945, §4922; RL 1955,
§16-2; HRS §263-2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next